src/fst/morphology/stems/prestems.lexc
!! This is the prestem lexicon. It is shared between the nouns and verbs, although regular nouns do not take the ordered prefix lexicon.
! This file also contains the final 

LEXICON PREFIXES2
@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@0 PN_COUNTER1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2m··t BOUND2 ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2miin BOUND2 ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2piin BOUND2 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@PV/m··taommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPm··taommita'p BOUND2 ;
@P.count1.P@PV/ik·t·'+:@P.count1.P@i2k·t·' BOUND2 ;
@P.count1.T@Imm+:@P.count1.T@ay·ak BOUND2 ;
@P.count1.T@Dur+:@P.count1.T@· BOUND2 ;
@P.count1.T@Fut+:@P.count1.T@y·ak BOUND2 ;
@P.count1.T@Past+:@P.count1.T@ii BOUND2 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ak·a BOUND2 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ik·a BOUND2 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ok·a BOUND2 ; ! enumerating this one because it appears in these three forms

LEXICON BOUND2
0:%< PN_COUNTER1 ;

!! This counter ensures that each type of prenoun can only appear once in the following order: 0, Negation | 0, Tense | 0, Aspect | 0, then ikata'

LEXICON PN_COUNTER1
@D.pvcountf@@R.count1.N@@P.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.N@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.A@@P.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.A@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.T@@P.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.T@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.P@@P.pvcountf.4@@R.count1.P@ PREFIXES2 ;
0 PRENOUNS ;

LEXICON BOUND3
0:%< PN_COUNTER ;

LEXICON PN_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PRENOUNS ;
! @R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PRENOUNS ;


LEXICON PREFIXES
@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@0 PV_COUNTER1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2m··t BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2miin BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2piin BOUND1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@PV/m··taommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPm··taommita'p BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.P@PV/ik·t·'+:@P.count1.P@i2k·t·' BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Imm+:@P.count1.T@ay·ak BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Dur+:@P.count1.T@· BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Fut+:@P.count1.T@y·ak BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.T@Past+:@P.count1.T@ii BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ak·a BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ik·a BOUND1 ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ok·a BOUND1 ; ! enumerating this one because it appears in these three forms

LEXICON BOUND1
0:%< PV_COUNTER1 ;

!! This counter ensures that each type of prenoun can only appear once in the following order: Negation | 0, Tense | 0, Aspect | 0, then ikata' | 0.

LEXICON PV_COUNTER1
@D.pvcountf@@R.count1.N@@P.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.N@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.A@@P.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.A@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.T@@P.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.T@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.P@@P.pvcountf.4@@R.count1.P@ PREFIXES ;
0 PREVERBS ;

LEXICON BOUND
0:%< PV_COUNTER ;

LEXICON PV_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PREVERBS ;
!@R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PREVERBS ;

LEXICON VERB_STEMS
@R.class.VAI@@R.pos.VERB@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@@R.pos.VERB@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTI@@R.pos.VERB@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTA@@R.pos.VERB@	VTA_STEMS ;
@P.class.VAI@@R.pos.VERBALIZE@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.class.VII@@R.pos.VERBALIZE@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;

!!! Now we collect the verb and noun stems !!!

! I am going to include the concrete verb finals (see Frantz 2017 chapter 18.)
! The reason being that this is the best place to control them considering the four verb classes
! The relfexive changes VTA verbs into VAI verbs and takes VAI suffixes. The same is true of the reciprocal. 
! The benfactive changes Intransitive to Transitive verbs.

!!!!! After this, we collect the stems !!!!!

! Blackfoot Regular Noun Stems

! Below are the INDEPENDENT noun stems and their allomorphic forms (only if the allomorph is irregular). 

LEXICON NOUN_STEMS
!@P.class.NA@0 
INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
!@P.class.NI@0 
INDEP_NI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VAI@0	
VAI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VII@0	
VII_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VTI@0	
VTI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VTA@0	
VTA_STEMS ;

!! END CODE !!

LEXICON PRENOUNS
0 NOUN_STEMS ;
PV/··hkam·'p+:%^SP··hkam·'p BOUND3 ;
PV/aahksikkam+:%^SPaahksikkam BOUND3 ;
PV/aaksta'+:aaksta' BOUND3 ;
PV/ai'tam·ak+:ai'tam·ak BOUND3 ;
PV/akisspÌ+:akisspÌ BOUND3 ;
PV/akoksska+:akoksska BOUND3 ;
PV/ama+:ama BOUND3 ;
PV/anaw+:anaw BOUND3 ;
PV/ano+:anow BOUND3 ;
PV/anow+:anow BOUND3 ;
PV/apa'p+:apa'p BOUND3 ;
PV/assaak+:assaak BOUND3 ;
PV/awa'+:awa' BOUND3 ;
PV/i'sskaan+:i2'sskaan BOUND3 ;
PV/ihta+:ihtaw BOUND3 ;
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND3 ;
PV/iikska'+:iikska' BOUND3 ;
PV/iim·+:iim· BOUND3 ;
PV/iinatt+:iinatt BOUND3 ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist BOUND3 ;
PV/ika'to+:i2ka'to BOUND3 ;
PV/ikamo't+:ikamo't BOUND3 ;
PV/ikihkiht+:ikihkiht BOUND3 ;
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND3 ;
PV/ikkihkini+:ikkihkini BOUND3 ;
PV/iksksowa'+:iksksowa' BOUND3 ;
PV/ikÌppoa+:ikÌppoa BOUND3 ;
PV/inai't+:inai't BOUND3 ;
PV/ipahtsik+:i2pahtsik BOUND3 ;
PV/ipapa+:ipapa BOUND3 ;
PV/ipoina+:ipoina BOUND3 ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa BOUND3 ;
PV/ip·kkssa+:i2p·kkssa BOUND3 ;
PV/isk+:isk BOUND3 ;
PV/ist+:ist BOUND3 ;
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND3 ;
PV/isttssi+:i2sttssi BOUND3 ;
PV/iton+:iton BOUND3 ;
PV/i·moohk+:i·moohk BOUND3 ;
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND3 ;
PV/kotski+:i2kotski BOUND3 ;
PV/k··tsisto+:k··tsisto BOUND3 ;
PV/m·ttsit+:%^SPm·ttsit BOUND3 ;
PV/mato+:mato BOUND3 ;
PV/miistap+:miistap BOUND3 ;
PV/mo'tÛÌ+:mo'tÛÌ BOUND3 ;
PV/naat+:%^SPnaat BOUND3 ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi BOUND3 ;
PV/noohk·tt+:%^SPnoohk·tt BOUND3 ;
PV/o'kio+:o'kio BOUND3 ;
PV/ohkana+:ohkana BOUND3 ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND3 ;
PV/ohpok+:ohpok BOUND3 ;
PV/oka'p+:oka'p BOUND3 ;
PV/omanista+:omanista BOUND3 ;
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap BOUND3 ;
PV/om·+:om· BOUND3 ;
PV/onaki+:onaki BOUND3 ;
PV/oohkatt+:oohkatt BOUND3 ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk BOUND3 ;
PV/po'kÌ+:po'kÌ BOUND3 ;
PV/sa+:saw BOUND3 ;
PV/saipa'+:saipa' BOUND3 ;
PV/sootam+:i2sootam BOUND3 ;
PV/sska'+:sska' BOUND3 ;
PV/sstok+:sstok BOUND3 ;
PV/ss·ak+:i2ss·ak BOUND3 ;
PV/waahki+:waahki BOUND3 ;
PV/waahtso+:waahtso BOUND3 ;
PV/waanook+:waanook BOUND3 ;
PV/w·y·k+:w·y·k BOUND3 ;
PV/yook+:yook BOUND3 ;
PV/·ka+:·ka BOUND3 ;
PV/··hkam·'p+:··hkam·'p BOUND3 ;
PV/Ìka+:Ìka BOUND3 ;
PN/aak·+:aak·	BOUND3 ;
PN/··pi+:··pi	BOUND3 ;
PN/ak·+:ak·	BOUND3 ;
PN/apak+:apak	BOUND3 ;
PN/ayaam+:ayaam	BOUND3 ;
PN/i'tsin+:i'tsin	BOUND3 ;
PN/iinohk+:iinohk	BOUND3 ;
PN/ikaw+:ikaw	BOUND3 ;
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta	BOUND3 ;
PN/ikkak+:ikkak	BOUND3 ;
PN/iksi's+:iksi's	BOUND3 ;
PN/iksim+:iksim	BOUND3 ;
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto	BOUND3 ;
PN/inap+:inap	BOUND3 ;
PN/inno+:i2nno	BOUND3 ;
PN/ipahp+:ipahp	BOUND3 ;
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi	BOUND3 ;
PN/ipisat+:ipisat	BOUND3 ;
PN/ippat+:ippat	BOUND3 ;
PN/isakoow+:isakoow	BOUND3 ;
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND3 ;
PN/isspik+:isspik	BOUND3 ;
PN/isttohk+:isttohk	BOUND3 ;
PN/itapiksst+:itapiksst	BOUND3 ;
PN/itsin+:itsin	BOUND3 ;
PN/kiihtsip+:kiihtsip	BOUND3 ;
PN/ksis+:ksis	BOUND3 ;
PN/m·Ûhk+:m·Ûhk	BOUND3 ;
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND3 ;
PN/mÌÌstap+:mÌÌstap	BOUND3 ;
PN/naam+:naam	BOUND3 ;
PN/naatsa+:naatsa	BOUND3 ;
PN/nimm+:nimm	BOUND3 ;
PN/o't+:o't	BOUND3 ;
PN/o'totam+:o'totam	BOUND3 ;
PN/ohkit+:ohkit	BOUND3 ;
PN/ohpo+:ohpo	BOUND3 ;
PN/ohsohkat+:ohsohkat	BOUND3 ;
PN/okaki+:okaki	BOUND3 ;
PN/omatap+:omatap	BOUND3 ;
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND3 ;
PN/opi+:opi	BOUND3 ;
PN/otats+:otats	BOUND3 ;
PN/Ûtssko+:Ûtssko	BOUND3 ;
PN/paahksÌst+:paahksÌst	BOUND3 ;
PN/pin··p+:pi2n··p	BOUND3 ;
PN/sa+:sa	BOUND3 ;
PN/saayippom+:saayippom	BOUND3 ;
PN/sainnis+:sainnis	BOUND3 ;
PN/sako+:sako	BOUND3 ;
PN/sata+:sata	BOUND3 ;
PN/sayippom+:sayippom	BOUND3 ;
PN/sikim+:i2sikim	BOUND3 ;
PN/sistsik+:i2sistsik	BOUND3 ;
PN/sohk+:sohk	BOUND3 ;
PN/sopow+:i2sopow	BOUND3 ;
PN/ssk+:ssk	BOUND3 ;
PN/sskon·t+:i2sskon·t	BOUND3 ;
PN/sspik+:sspik	BOUND3 ;
PN/wa'kot+:wa'kot	BOUND3 ;
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND3 ;
PN/waamohs+:waamohs	BOUND3 ;
PN/waaniit+:waaniit	BOUND3 ;
PN/waapo'k+:waapo'k	BOUND3 ;
PN/waawow+:waawow	BOUND3 ;
PN/y··hs+:y··hs	BOUND3 ;
PN/yaam+:yaam	BOUND3 ;
PN/yoohk+:yoohk	BOUND3 ;
LEXICON PREVERBS
0 VERB_STEMS ;
PV/··hkam·'p+:%^SP··hkam·'p BOUND ;
PV/aahksikkam+:%^SPaahksikkam BOUND ;
PV/aaksta'+:aaksta' BOUND ;
PV/ai'tam·ak+:ai'tam·ak BOUND ;
PV/akisspÌ+:akisspÌ BOUND ;
PV/akoksska+:akoksska BOUND ;
PV/ama+:ama BOUND ;
PV/anaw+:anaw BOUND ;
PV/ano+:anow BOUND ;
PV/anow+:anow BOUND ;
PV/apa'p+:apa'p BOUND ;
PV/assaak+:assaak BOUND ;
PV/awa'+:awa' BOUND ;
PV/i'sskaan+:i2'sskaan BOUND ;
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND ;
PV/iikska'+:iikska' BOUND ;
PV/iim·+:iim· BOUND ;
PV/iinatt+:iinatt BOUND ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist BOUND ;
PV/ika'to+:i2ka'to BOUND ;
PV/ikamo't+:ikamo't BOUND ;
PV/ikihkiht+:ikihkiht BOUND ;
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND ;
PV/ikkihkini+:ikkihkini BOUND ;
PV/iksksowa'+:iksksowa' BOUND ;
PV/ikÌppoa+:ikÌppoa BOUND ;
PV/inai't+:inai't BOUND ;
PV/ipahtsik+:i2pahtsik BOUND ;
PV/ipapa+:ipapa BOUND ;
PV/ipoina+:ipoina BOUND ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa BOUND ;
PV/ip·kkssa+:i2p·kkssa BOUND ;
PV/isk+:isk BOUND ;
PV/ist+:ist BOUND ;
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND ;
PV/isttssi+:i2sttssi BOUND ;
PV/iton+:iton BOUND ;
PV/i·moohk+:i·moohk BOUND ;
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND ;
PV/kotski+:i2kotski BOUND ;
PV/k··tsisto+:k··tsisto BOUND ;
PV/m·ttsit+:%^SPm·ttsit BOUND ;
PV/mato+:mato BOUND ;
PV/miistap+:miistap BOUND ;
PV/mo'tÛÌ+:mo'tÛÌ BOUND ;
PV/naat+:%^SPnaat BOUND ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi BOUND ;
PV/noohk·tt+:%^SPnoohk·tt BOUND ;
PV/o'kio+:o'kio BOUND ;
PV/ohkana+:ohkana BOUND ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND ;
PV/ohpok+:ohpok BOUND ;
PV/oka'p+:oka'p BOUND ;
PV/omanista+:omanista BOUND ;
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap BOUND ;
PV/om·+:om· BOUND ;
PV/onaki+:onaki BOUND ;
PV/oohkatt+:oohkatt BOUND ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk BOUND ;
PV/po'kÌ+:po'kÌ BOUND ;
PV/sa+:saw BOUND ;
PV/saipa'+:saipa' BOUND ;
PV/sootam+:i2sootam BOUND ;
PV/sska'+:sska' BOUND ;
PV/sstok+:sstok BOUND ;
PV/ss·ak+:i2ss·ak BOUND ;
PV/waahki+:waahki BOUND ;
PV/waahtso+:waahtso BOUND ;
PV/waanook+:waanook BOUND ;
PV/w·y·k+:w·y·k BOUND ;
PV/yook+:yook BOUND ;
PV/·ka+:·ka BOUND ;
PV/··hkam·'p+:··hkam·'p BOUND ;
PV/Ìka+:Ìka BOUND ;
PN/aak·+:aak·	BOUND ;
PN/··pi+:··pi	BOUND ;
PN/ak·+:ak·	BOUND ;
PN/apak+:apak	BOUND ;
PN/ayaam+:ayaam	BOUND ;
PN/i'tsin+:i'tsin	BOUND ;
PN/iinohk+:iinohk	BOUND ;
PN/ikaw+:ikaw	BOUND ;
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta	BOUND ;
PN/ikkak+:ikkak	BOUND ;
PN/iksi's+:iksi's	BOUND ;
PN/iksim+:iksim	BOUND ;
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto	BOUND ;
PN/inap+:inap	BOUND ;
PN/inno+:i2nno	BOUND ;
PN/ipahp+:ipahp	BOUND ;
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi	BOUND ;
PN/ipisat+:ipisat	BOUND ;
PN/ippat+:ippat	BOUND ;
PN/isakoow+:isakoow	BOUND ;
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND ;
PN/isspik+:isspik	BOUND ;
PN/isttohk+:isttohk	BOUND ;
PN/itapiksst+:itapiksst	BOUND ;
PN/itsin+:itsin	BOUND ;
PN/kiihtsip+:kiihtsip	BOUND ;
PN/ksis+:ksis	BOUND ;
PN/m·Ûhk+:m·Ûhk	BOUND ;
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND ;
PN/mÌÌstap+:mÌÌstap	BOUND ;
PN/naam+:naam	BOUND ;
PN/naatsa+:naatsa	BOUND ;
PN/nimm+:nimm	BOUND ;
PN/o't+:o't	BOUND ;
PN/o'totam+:o'totam	BOUND ;
PN/ohkit+:ohkit	BOUND ;
PN/ohpo+:ohpo	BOUND ;
PN/ohsohkat+:ohsohkat	BOUND ;
PN/okaki+:okaki	BOUND ;
PN/omatap+:omatap	BOUND ;
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND ;
PN/opi+:opi	BOUND ;
PN/otats+:otats	BOUND ;
PN/Ûtssko+:Ûtssko	BOUND ;
PN/paahksÌst+:paahksÌst	BOUND ;
PN/pin··p+:pi2n··p	BOUND ;
PN/sa+:sa	BOUND ;
PN/saayippom+:saayippom	BOUND ;
PN/sainnis+:sainnis	BOUND ;
PN/sako+:sako	BOUND ;
PN/sata+:sata	BOUND ;
PN/sayippom+:sayippom	BOUND ;
PN/sikim+:i2sikim	BOUND ;
PN/sistsik+:i2sistsik	BOUND ;
PN/sohk+:sohk	BOUND ;
PN/sopow+:i2sopow	BOUND ;
PN/ssk+:ssk	BOUND ;
PN/sskon·t+:i2sskon·t	BOUND ;
PN/sspik+:sspik	BOUND ;
PN/wa'kot+:wa'kot	BOUND ;
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND ;
PN/waamohs+:waamohs	BOUND ;
PN/waaniit+:waaniit	BOUND ;
PN/waapo'k+:waapo'k	BOUND ;
PN/waawow+:waawow	BOUND ;
PN/y··hs+:y··hs	BOUND ;
PN/yaam+:yaam	BOUND ;
PN/yoohk+:yoohk	BOUND ;
